New Jersey, session 221, A4368.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, in the 2024-2025 school year and each school year thereafter, a school district shall receive stabilized reduction aid in such amount as to ensure that the district receives the greater of the amount of State school aid calculated for the district pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-43 et al.) or the amount of State school aid received by the district for the prior school year, reduced by no more than five percent. b.  A county vocational school district shall receive the greater of the amount of State school aid calculated pursuant to the provisions of this section or the amount of State school aid calculated pursuant to the provisions of section 5 of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-69). c.  For the purposes of this section, State school aid means equalization aid, special education categorical aid, security categorical aid, transportation aid, and adjustment aid as calculated in accordance with the provisions of sections 11, 13, 14, 15, and 16 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-53, C.18A:7F-55, C.18A:7F-56, C.18A:7F-57, and C.18A:7F-58), respectively. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.